Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 214.41, is amended to read: 214.41 deleted text begin PHYSICIANdeleted text end new text begin HEALTH CARE PROVIDERnew text end WELLNESS PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Definitiondeleted text end new text begin Definitionsnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end For the purposes of this section, new text begin the following terms have the meanings given.new text end new text begin (b) "Health care provider" or "provider" means an individual who is licensed or registered by the state to perform health care services within the provider's scope of practice and in accordance with state law. new text end new text begin (c) new text end "deleted text begin physiciandeleted text end new text begin Health care providernew text end wellness program" means a program new text begin for health care providers new text end of evaluation, counseling, or other modality to address an issue related to career fatigue or wellness related to work stress deleted text begin for physicians licensed under chapter 147deleted text end that is administered by a statewide association that is exempt from taxation under United States Code, title 26, section 501(c)(6), and that primarily represents physicians and osteopaths of multiple specialties. deleted text begin Physiciandeleted text end new text begin Health care providernew text end wellness program does not include the provision of services intended to monitor for impairment under the authority of section 214.31. Subd. 2. Confidentiality. Any record of a deleted text begin person'sdeleted text end new text begin health care provider'snew text end participation in a deleted text begin physiciandeleted text end new text begin health care providernew text end wellness program is confidential and not subject to discovery, subpoena, or a reporting requirement to the applicable new text begin health-related licensing new text end boardnew text begin or to the commissioner of healthnew text end , unless the deleted text begin persondeleted text end new text begin providernew text end voluntarily provides for written release of the information or the disclosure is required to meet the deleted text begin licensee'sdeleted text end new text begin provider'snew text end obligation to report new text begin certain information to the applicable health-related licensing board or the commissioner of health new text end according to deleted text begin section 147.111deleted text end new text begin law governing the practice of the provider's professionnew text end . Subd. 3. Civil liability. Any person, agency, institution, facility, or organization employed by, contracting with, or operating a deleted text begin physiciandeleted text end new text begin health care providernew text end wellness program is immune from civil liability for any action related to their duties in connection with a deleted text begin physiciandeleted text end new text begin health care providernew text end wellness program when acting in good faith.